fr: café doux sans caféine
nl: zachte koffie zonder cafeïne

en: coffee powder
bg: кафе на прах
de: Kaffeepulver
es: café en polvo
fi: kahvijauhe
fr: café en poudre
hr: kava u prahu
it: caffè in polvere
nl: koffiepoeder
sv: kaffepulver

en: arabica coffee, coffee Arabica, arabica, coffea arabica
ar: بن عربي
az: Ərəb qəhvəsi
bg: кафе арабика, арабика
ca: Coffea arabica
cs: Kávovník arabský
cv: Кофе Арабика
da: Arabicakaffe
de: Kaffe Arabica, reiner Arabica-Kaffee, Arabica Kaffee
eo: Arabia kofeo
es: Coffea arabica, café arabica, puro arabica
et: Araabia kohvipuu
fa: قهوه عربیکا
fi: Arabiankahvi, arabica-kahvi
fr: café arabica, arabica, Café 100 % arabica, café pur arabica, coffea arabica
he: קפה ערביקה
hr: kave 100 arabica, kave arabica, arabica kave, zrna Arabica
hu: Arab kávé, arabica kávé, arabica
hy: Սուրճ Արաբիկա
id: Kopi arabika
it: Coffea arabica, caffè Arabica
ja: アラビカコーヒーノキ
kn: ಅರಾಬಿಕ ಕಾಫಿ
ko: 커피나무
la: Coffea arabica
lt: Arabinis kavamedis
mk: Coffea arabica
ml: കോഫി അറബിക
nl: arabica koffie, Coffea arabica
no: Coffea arabica
pl: Kawa arabska
pt: Coffea arabica
qu: Kaphiy yura
ro: Coffea arabica
ru: Кофе аравийский
sd: ڪافي عربيڪا
sg: Kâfe
sk: Kávovník arabský
sl: Arabski kavovec
sv: arabicakaffer, arabiska kaffe, Arabiskt kaffe
to: Kofi
tr: Arabica kahvesi
uk: Кава аравійська
uz: Coffea arabica
vi: Cà phê chè
zh: 小果咖啡

en: Brazilian arabica coffee
de: brasilianischer Arabica-Kaffee
es: café arábica brasileño
fr: cafe arabica du Brésil
hr: brazilska arabica kava
it: caffè arabica brasiliano
nl: Braziliaanse arabica koffie

fr: café arabica torréfié
en: roasted arabica coffee
de: gerösteter Arabica-Kaffee
es: café arábica tostado
hr: pržena arabica kava
it: caffè arabica tostato

en: arabica coffee extract
de: Arabicakaffeeextrakt
fi: arabiankahviuute, arabica kahviuute
fr: extraits de café arabica
hr: ekstrakt kave arabica
it: estratto di caffè Arabica
sv: arabica kaffeextrakt

en: coffea robusta, coffea canephora
ar: بن قصبي
ca: Cafè robust
cs: Kávovník statný
de: Robusta-Kaffee
eo: Fortika kofeo
es: Coffea canephora
et: Kongo kohvipuu
fa: قهوه کانفورا
fi: Kongonkahvi
fr: Coffea canephora
he: קפה רובוסטה
hr: kava robusta, robusta kave
hu: Robuszta kávé
id: Kopi Robusta
it: Coffea canephora
ja: ロブスタコーヒーノキ
lt: Didysis kavamedis
ml: റോബസ്റ്റ കാപ്പി
nl: Coffea canephora
no: Coffea canephora
pl: Kawa kongijska
pt: Coffea canephora
ro: Coffea robusta
ru: Кофе канефора
sk: Kávovník mohutný
sv: Robustakaffe
uk: Робуста
uz: Coffea canephora
vi: Cà phê vối
zh: 中果咖啡

en: coffee beans
bg: кафе на зърна
de: Kaffeebohnen, Kaffee-Bohnen
es: Granos de café
fi: kahvipavut
fr: café en grains
hr: zrna kave
it: chicchi di caffè
ja: コーヒー豆, 珈琲豆
ko: 커피원두
nl: koffiebonen

en: ground coffee
bg: смляно кафе
de: gemahlener Kaffee
es: cafe molido
fi: jauhettu kahvi
fr: café moulu
hr: mljevena mješavina kavovina, mljevena kava, mješavina mljevene kave
it: caffè macinato
nl: gemalen koffie
ro: cafea măcinată

en: Ground roasted coffee, roast and ground coffee
de: Röstkaffee gemahlen
es: café tostado y molido
fi: paahdettu kahvijauhe
fr: café torréfié moulu, Café torréfié et moulu
hr: pržene mljevene kave
it: caffè torrefatto macinato
nl: gemalen gebrande koffie, gebrande koffie gemalen, gebrande en gemalen koffie
pt: café torrado moído

en: roasted coffee
bg: печено кафе
de: Röstkaffee
es: café tostado
fi: paahdettu kahvi
fr: café torréfié
hr: pržena kava
it: caffè torrefatto
nl: gebrande koffie
pt: café torrado

en: roasted coffee beans
de: Röstkaffee in Bohnen
es: granos de café tostados, granos de café tostado
fi: paahdetut kahvipavut
fr: café torréfié en grains
hr: pržena kava u zrnu
it: caffè torrefatto in chicchi
nl: gebrande koffiebonen

en: instant coffee, soluble coffee
ar: قهوة فورية
az: hazır qəhvə
bg: разтворимо кафе
ca: cafè instantani
cs: instantní káva
de: löslicher kaffee
el: στιγμιαίος καφές
eo: tuja kafo
es: café soluble, café instantáneo
et: lahustuv kohv
eu: istanteko kafe
fa: قهوه فوری
fi: pikakahvi
fr: café soluble, café instantané
he: קפה נמס
hi: तत्क्षण कॉफी
hr: instant kava, topiva kava
hu: instant kávé
id: kopi instan
is: skyndikaffi
it: caffè solubile
ja: インスタントコーヒー
ka: ხსნადი ყავა
kk: ерітілмелі кофе
ko: 인스턴트커피
lt: tirpi kava
nb: pulverkaffe
nl: oploskoffie, instantkoffie, instant koffie
nn: pulverkaffi
pl: kawa rozpuszczalna
pt: café solúvel
ru: растворимый кофе
sa: काफीचूर्णम्
sk: instantná káva
sv: snabbkaffe
tr: hazır kahve
uk: розчинна кава
vi: cà phê hòa tan
zh: 即溶咖啡

en: decaffeinated instant coffee
fr: Café décaféiné instantané
it: caffè istantaneo decaffeinato

en: cold brew coffee
de: cold brew Kaffee, cold brew coffee
fi: kylmäuutettu kahvi
fr: café infusé à froid
hr: hladna kava
it: caffè freddo

en: creatine
ar: كرياتين
be: крэацін
bg: креатин
ca: creatina
cs: kreatin
da: kreatin
de: kreatin
el: κρεατίνη
eo: kreatino
es: creatina
et: kreatiin
fa: کراتین فسفات
fi: kreatiini
fr: créatine
gl: creatina
he: קראטין
hr: kreatin
hu: kreatin
hy: կրեատին
id: kreatina
it: creatina
ja: クレアチン
ko: 크레아틴
lt: kreatinas
lv: kreatīns
mk: креатин
ml: ക്രിയാറ്റിനിൻ
ms: kreatina
nb: kreatin
nl: creatine
pl: kreatyna
pt: creatina
ro: creatină
ru: креатин
sh: kreatin
sk: kreatín
sr: kreatin
sv: kreatin
tr: kreatin
uk: креатин
vi: creatine
zh: 肌酸

en: creatine monohydrate
de: kreatin-monohydrat
fi: kreatiinimonohydraatti
fr: créatine monohydrate, mono-hydrate de créatine
hr: kreatin monohidrat
it: Monoidrato di creatina
pl: monohydrat kreatyny

en: plant stanol
de: Pflanzenstanole
fi: kasvistanoli, kasvistanolit
fr: stanols végétaux
hr: biljka stanol
it: stanolo vegetale
pl: stanole roślinne
sv: växtstanol

en: plant stanol ester
de: Pflanzenstanolester
fi: kasvistanoliesteri, kasvistanoliesterit
fr: esters de stanols végétaux
hr: biljni stanol ester
it: estere di stanolo vegetale
pl: estry stanoli roślinnych
sv: växtstanolester

en: plant sterol ester
es: éster de esterol vegetal, ésteres de esteroles vegetales
fi: kasvisteroliesteri, kasvisteroliesterit
fr: ester de stérol végétal, esters de stérol végétal
pl: estry steroli roślinnych